Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB268.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 2 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 10/31/2025 1:35 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 905
(1) As used in this section, "Green Star flag" means a flag with a green star
prominently displayed in the center of a white background and surrounded by a
red border.
(2) The Green Star flag is designated as the Commonwealth's symbol of continued
awareness of military service member and veteran suicide and the commitment to
recognize and resolve military service member and veteran suicide.
(3) All Green Star flags purchased by a public institution or displayed by a public
institution shall be manufactured in the United States.
(4) The Green Star flag may be displayed wherever there is a flag of the United
States, Commonwealth of Kentucky flag, or POW/MIA flag.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 10/31/2025 1:35 PM Jacketed